Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 22

Commissioners of the Poor

71-5-2201. Permanent body — Name — Appointment — Term of office.

The commissioners of the poor shall be a permanent body, by the name of the “Commissioners of the Poor for County.”

In the selection, the county legislative body shall, at its October session, choose at the beginning one (1) commissioner to hold for the term of one (1) year, another for the term of two (2) years, and a third for a term of three (3) years, and annually thereafter for three (3) years each, and to hold until the successor of each is selected and qualified.

Should the court omit to make the appointment at that session, it may be done at any subsequent session.

Code 1858, § 1597; Acts 1879, ch. 102, § 1; 1889, ch. 150, § 1; Shan., § 2681; mod. Code 1932, § 4798; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-901, 14-20-201.

Cross-References. Appointment of commissioners, §71-5-2103.

71-5-2202. Oath of office.

Each commissioner, before entering upon the discharge of such commissioner's duties, shall take an oath before the county clerk, in term or vacation, to well and truly discharge such commissioner's duties as prescribed by law.

Code 1858, § 1599 (deriv. Acts 1826 Private, ch. 56, § 4; 1831, ch. 89, § 3); Shan., § 2683; Code 1932, § 4800; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-902, 14-20-202.

71-5-2203. Chair — Minutes.

The commissioners shall appoint one (1) of their number chair, and they shall keep minutes of their proceedings in a well-bound book.

Code 1858, § 1600; Shan., § 2684; Code 1932, § 4801; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-903, 14-20-203.

71-5-2204. Compensation.

The county legislative body shall in all cases pay a reasonable compensation to the superintendent and the commissioners.

Code 1858, § 1614; Shan., § 2698; Code 1932, § 4815; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-904, 14-20-204.

71-5-2205. Removal — Vacancies.

The county legislative body may remove the commissioners, or any one (1) of them, at pleasure, and proceed to fill the vacancy at any time; and should any one (1) or more of them die, resign, remove from the county, or fail or refuse to act, the county mayor may fill the vacancy, and such appointee shall continue to act as commissioner until an election by the legislative body.

Code 1858, § 1598 (deriv. Acts 1827 Private, ch. 112, § 7); Shan., § 2682; Code 1932, § 4799; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 4799; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-905, 14-20-205; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

71-5-2206. Order for expenditures — Warrants.

When money is to be drawn from the county treasury for the purchase of the site of the asylum, the erection of the buildings, for improvements, repairs, or for the ordinary expenses of the maintenance of the poor, it shall be done upon an order of the commission, entered upon its minutes, specifying the purpose to which the money is to be applied; upon production of a copy of which, signed by the county mayor and attested by one (1) of the other commissioners, to the county legislative body, and appropriation shall on approval be made for the amount specified in the order, to be drawn on warrant of the county mayor, as in other cases.

Code 1858, § 1601; Shan., § 2685; mod. Code 1932, § 4802; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-906, 14-20-206; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

71-5-2207. Book of accounts — Items entered.

The commissioners shall keep a book of accounts, in which they shall charge themselves with all moneys drawn by them from the treasury of the county, specifying the number and date of the warrant on which each sum was drawn, and credit themselves with their disbursements, giving the number and date of each voucher, and preserving the same.

Code 1858, § 1602; Shan., § 2686; Code 1932, § 4803; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-907, 14-20-207.

71-5-2208. Examination and preservation of accounts.

The book of accounts shall be balanced every year, and, on or before December 31, shall be submitted to the county mayor for settlement, together with the vouchers.

If the county mayor finds the account correct, the county mayor shall write beneath the same the words, “examined and approved,” and sign the county mayor's name to the book of accounts, and retain the vouchers, and cause them to be placed in the office of the county clerk, and carefully preserved in separate files.

Code 1858, § 1603; Shan., § 2687; Code 1932, § 4804; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-908, 14-20-208; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

71-5-2209. Liability for expenditures.

The commissioners shall be jointly and severally liable for the application of any money drawn on their order from the county treasury for the use of the asylum.

Code 1858, § 1604; Shan., § 2688; Code 1932, § 4805; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-909, 14-20-209.

71-5-2210. Annual report.

The commissioners shall report to the county legislative body, at its January session every year, the condition of the asylum, making the superintendent's report a part of their own.

Code 1858, § 1612; Shan., § 2696; Code 1932, § 4813; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-910, 14-20-210.

Cross-References. Superintendent's report, §71-5-2110.

Supervision of contractors for care of poor, §§71-5-2305,71-5-2306.